Arkansas, session 2025, HB1412.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-71-110(d), concerning the powers and
duties of the Oil and Gas Commission, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(20) To take the following actions related to pipeline facilities used
in the transportation of hazardous liquids or carbon dioxide:
(A) Submit a satisfactory state certification;
(B) Promulgate rules required by the United States
Department of Transportation Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety
Administration to assume authority over national safety standards and
reporting requirements; and
(C) Upon receiving certification, administer and enforce
the standards and requirements.




*CRH122*
02/04/2025 2:13:53 PM CRH122